Utah statutes.
63A-3-102.   Director of division -- Appointment.

(1)  The executive director shall appoint the director of the Division of Finance with the approval of the governor.

(2)  The director of the Division of Finance shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director.

(3)  The director of the Division of Finance is the state's chief fiscal officer and the state's accounting officer.



Enacted by Chapter 212, 1993 General Session

